Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 15.
[REPEALED.]

Publisher's Notes.

Ark. Const. Amend. 94, which repealed this amendment effective November 5, 2014, was proposed by H.J.R. 1009 during the 2013 Regular Session and adopted at the November 2014 general election by a vote of 428,206 for and 388,459 against.

Before repeal, this amendment read:

“Salaries of state officials.

“The annual salaries of the State and District Officers hereinafter mentioned, which shall be paid in monthly installments, shall be as follows:

“For Governor, the sum of $6,000.00; for Secretary of State, the sum of $4,000.00; for Treasurer of the State, the sum of $4,000.00; for Auditor of the State, the sum of $4,000.00; for Attorney General, the sum of $5,000.00; for Judge of the Circuit Courts and Chancellors, each, the sum of $3,600.00.

“The members of the General Assembly shall receive as their salary the sum of One Thousand ($1,000.00) Dollars, except the Speaker of the House of Representatives, who shall receive his salary of Eleven Hundred Dollars ($1,100.00), for each period of two (2) years; and in addition to such salary the members of the general Assembly shall receive five cents per mile for each mile traveled in going to and returning from the seat of government over the most direct and practicable route, and provided further that when said members are required to attend an extraordinary session of the General Assembly they shall receive in addition to the salary herein provided the sum of 6.00 per day for each day they are required to attend, and mileage at the rate herein provided.”

Amendment 15 was proposed by the General Assembly at the 1927 regular session (see Acts 1927, p. 1189). It was approved at the general election on Nov. 6, 1928, by a vote of 94,528 for and 56,042 against.

The amendment was held to be superseded by Ark. Const. Amend. 37 in Berry v. Gordon, 237 Ark. 547 and 865, 376 S.W.2d 276 (1964). Ark. Const. Amend. 37 was repealed by Ark. Const. Amend. 56, §
5.

For current provision concerning salaries, see
Ark. Const., Art. 19, § 31.